Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 297.466 is amended to read:
297.466. (1) In performing an audit and review required under ORS 297.425, the accountant under
contract with the municipal corporation or the Secretary  of State, whoever performs the audit and
review, shall determine  if the municipal corporation has, or has not, followed generally accepted
accounting principles in reporting  its financial condition and operations, established appropriate
accounting systems and internal controls and substantially complied  with legal requirements in
conducting its financial affairs. The determination shall either be included in  the signed expression
of opinion or otherwise disclosed in the audit report required under ORS 297.465.
(2) Upon receipt of an audit report under ORS 297.465, the governing body of a  municipal cor-
poration shall determine the measures it considers  necessary to address any deficiencies disclosed
in the report. The governing body shall adopt a plan of action to address  the deficiencies. The plan
must include the estimated period of time necessary to complete the planned actions.
(3)[(a)] Within  30 days after filing an audit report with the Secretary of State under ORS 297.465,
a municipal corporation shall  file with the secretary a copy of the plan of action adopted under
subsection (2) of this section.
[(b) At the request of the governing body of the  municipal corporation, the secretary shall make
suggestions for addressing the deficiencies cited in the audit report. ]
[(c) For counties  and cities, upon receipt by the secretary of the audit report and the plan of action
adopted under subsection (2) of this section, the secretary shall either  acknowledge the county or city’s
plan of action to address the deficiencies cited in the audit report or notify the county or city of  defi-
ciencies that, if  not addressed, could result in withholding of funds under this section. If the governing
body of the county or city does not agree with the  notification by the secretary, the secretary shall
provide the governing body with an opportunity  for a conference regarding the notification, audit de-
terminations or corrective measures to be taken. ]
[(4) If the  Secretary of State determines that a county or city has not filed an audit report with the
secretary as required  under ORS 297.465, the secretary may certify the determination to the State
Treasurer, the Director of the Department of Revenue, the Director  of Transportation and the Director
of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2110 (HB 2110-A) Page 1
[(5) If the Secretary of State concurs with determinations  made under subsection (1) of this section
in two successive audits and reviews of the same county or city, and determines that the governing body
of the county or city has not taken adequate action to  address the deficiencies cited in the notifications
given under subsection (3) of this section, the secretary may certify the determination to the  State
Treasurer, the Director of the Department of Revenue, the Director  of Transportation and the Director
of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services. The certificate of the  secretary under this sub-
section may be issued only after notice, opportunity to be heard and hearing pursuant to the  provisions
of ORS chapter 183, governing contested cases. The hearing shall be held within the jurisdiction of the
county or city. ]
[(6) Upon receipt of a certificate from the Secretary of  State under subsection (4) or (5) of this
section, the State Treasurer, the  Director of the Department of Revenue, the Director of Transportation
and the Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall withhold from distribution
to the county or city 10 percent of the moneys otherwise to be distributed  to it under ORS 221.770,
323.455, 366.762 to 366.768,  366.785 to 366.820, 471.805 and 471.810. The moneys withheld shall be
disbursed to the county or city only after the  officer responsible for disbursement has received notice
from the secretary that: ]
[(a) The county or  city has filed the audit report required under ORS 297.465 with the secretary;
or]
[(b) The governing body of the county  or city has taken action to follow generally accepted ac-
counting principles in reporting financial condition and operations and establish appropriate account-
ing systems and internal  controls and will substantially comply with legal requirements in conducting
its financial affairs. ]
[(7) The Secretary of State may not  issue a certificate under subsection (5) of this section for failure
to follow generally accepted accounting principles if a county or  city has followed accounting practices
authorized by state law. ]
[(8)] (4)  As used in this section, “generally accepted accounting principles”  means those ac-
counting principles sanctioned by recognized  authoritative bodies such as the Governmental Ac-
counting Standards Board, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, the Financial
Accounting Standards Board or their successors.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 297.435 is amended to read:
297.435. (1) Subject to ORS 297.445, ORS 297.425  does not apply to any municipal corporation,
except a county or a school district, if, with respect to  any one [ calendar year or ] fiscal year, the
municipal corporation meets all the conditions in either subsection (2) or (3) of this section.
(2)(a) Total expenditures [ for all purposes,  including moneys expended for debt retirement, ] did not
exceed [ $150,000] $250,000 for the year;
(b) The municipal corporation has submitted financial statements for the year  to the Secretary
of State within 90 days following the end of the year; and
(c) A certificate has been submitted with the  financial statements stating that the principal re-
sponsible official of the municipal corporation was covered during the entire year  by a fidelity or
faithful performance  bond in an amount at least equal to the total amount of moneys received by
the municipal corporation during the year.
(3)(a) Total expenditures [ for all purposes, including  moneys expended for debt retirement, ] ex-
ceeded [ $150,000] $250,000 but did not exceed [ $500,000] $1,000,000 for the year;
(b) The municipal corporation  has submitted financial statements for the year to the Secretary
of State within 180 days  following the end of the year, and [ the financial statements have been re-
viewed by  an accountant or the Secretary of State in accordance with standards prescribed by the
Secretary of State ] an accountant or the Secretary  of State has performed the procedures es-
tablished under subsection (5) of this section on the financial statements ; and
(c) A certificate has been submitted with  the financial statements stating that the official re-
sponsible for receiving and disbursing moneys on behalf  of the municipal corporation was covered
during the entire year by a fidelity or faithful  performance bond in an amount at least equal to 10
percent of the total receipts for the year, but not less than [ $10,000] $25,000.
Enrolled House Bill 2110 (HB 2110-A) Page 2
(4) The financial statements required by this section  shall be in a form prescribed by the Sec-
retary of  State and shall be considered audit reports for the purpose of the filing fee required by
ORS 297.485.
[(5) The provisions of ORS  297.466 apply to financial statements for cities reviewed under sub-
section (3) of this section. ]
(5)(a) The Secretary of State  shall, by rule, establish procedures to be performed on fi-
nancial statements under  subsection (3) of this section that the secretary deems appropriate
to:
(A) Address risks to municipal corporations; and
(B) Ensure compliance by municipal corporations with applicable laws.
(b) In adopting or amending rules under  this subsection, the Secretary of State shall
consult with the Oregon Board of Accountancy, the Oregon Society of Certified Public  Ac-
countants and one or more organizations representing municipal corporations.
SECTION 3.
The Secretary of State shall, by rule, specify categories and types of spend-
ing that constitute expenditures for purposes of ORS 297.435 and 297.485.
SECTION 4.  ORS 297.425 is amended to read:
297.425. (1) Except as  provided in ORS 297.435, the accounts and fiscal affairs of every municipal
corporation shall be audited and reviewed at  least once each [ calendar or ] fiscal year[ , and more
often if considered advisable by the governing body or managing or  executive officer of the municipal
corporation]. The audits and  reviews shall be made by accountants pursuant to contracts entered
into by  the governing body, or managing or executive officer, and accountants, or by the Secretary
of State pursuant  to a duly adopted ordinance or resolution. Upon request of the secretary, the
governing body, or managing or executive officer, shall provide the secretary with a copy of  the
contract entered into or an ordinance or resolution adopted under this section.
(2) The compensation for audits and reviews performed by accountants shall be as  agreed upon
between the governing body, or managing  or executive officer of the municipal corporation, and the
accountant, and shall be paid in the same manner as other claims against the municipal corporation
are paid.
(3) All expenses and costs incurred by the Secretary  of State in conducting audits and reviews
for municipal corporations shall be borne by the municipal corporation  for which a particular audit
or review is made. The expenses and costs shall be paid to  the secretary in the same manner as
other claims against the municipal corporation are paid.
(4) Audits and reviews required by this section shall [ inquire into: ]
[(a) The principles of accounting and methods followed by the municipal corporation in recording,
summarizing and reporting its financial transactions and financial condition; ]
[(b) The accuracy and legality of the  transactions, accounts, records, files and financial reports of
the officers and employees of the municipal corporation as they relate to its fiscal affairs; and ]
[(c) Compliance with requirements, orders and regulations of other public officials which pertain
to the financial condition or financial operations of the municipal corporation. ] be performed in ac-
cordance with standards promulgated by the American Institute of Certified  Public Ac-
countants and shall inquire into principles of accounting,  methods of operations and
compliance with regulations as identified by rule of the Secretary of State.
SECTION 5.
ORS 297.455 and 297.459 are repealed.
SECTION 6.  ORS 297.465 is amended to read:
297.465. (1) The Secretary of State, in cooperation with  the Oregon Board of Accountancy, and
in consultation with the Oregon Society of Certified Public Accountants, shall prescribe the mini-
mum standards for conducting audits of municipal corporations,  preparing the resulting audit re-
ports and expressing opinions upon the financial condition and results of operation for the  period
under audit. The expression of opinion shall  be signed by the accountant signing the contract, or in
the case of a partnership or professional corporation, by a partner or stockholder who  is an ac-
countant as defined in ORS  297.405, who has personally conducted the audit to an extent satisfac-
tory to the secretary and to the municipal corporation.
Enrolled House Bill 2110 (HB 2110-A) Page 3
(2) The municipal corporation shall be furnished  with a written audit report, containing a signed
expression of opinion, in  the form prescribed by the Secretary of State. A copy of the audit report
shall be furnished to each person who was a member of the governing body at the end  of the [ cal-
endar or ] fiscal year and to each member of  the current governing body. [ Other copies shall be fur-
nished the municipal corporation as are requested by  the chairperson of the governing body or the
managing or  executive officer. ] The accountant shall furnish the audit report to the municipal cor-
poration within six months after the  close of the [ calendar or ] fiscal year under audit, unless the
secretary has granted the municipal corporation an extension under subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) The municipal corporation shall file one copy of its audit report  with the Secretary of
State within six months after the close of the [ calendar or ] fiscal year under audit, unless the sec-
retary, for good cause shown,  grants to the municipal corporation a reasonable extension of time.
The extension may not exceed one year after the close of the [ calendar or ] fiscal year  under audit
unless the secretary finds that extraordinary circumstances  justify a longer extension. A municipal
corporation is delinquent for purposes of the filing requirement under this subsection if the munici-
pal corporation does not file the audit report by  the deadline or any extended deadline described in
this subsection.
(b) The report is subject to review by the secretary,  who may also require submission of the
supporting documentation and audit programs of the accountant.
(c) If an  audit, audit report or expression of opinion is found by the secretary not to be in ac-
cordance with the prescribed  standards, the secretary shall request compliance. [ If the accountant
fails to comply with the request, ] The secretary [ shall] may  report the [ failure] request  to comply
to the Oregon Board of  Accountancy, which may investigate the accountant’s work or  remove
or suspend the name of the accountant from the roster required by ORS 297.670.
(4) Audit reports or financial statements filed  with the Secretary of State as required by ORS
297.405 to 297.555 shall include the names, physical or electronic  mailing addresses and  titles of
the officers and members of the governing board of  the municipal corporation. The report or state-
ment of a special district shall include the name of its registered agent and the address  of its reg-
istered office as provided by ORS 198.335 to 198.365.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 297.485 is amended to read:
297.485. (1) At the time an audit report, prepared  by an accountant, is filed with the Secretary
of State, as required by ORS  297.465, the municipal corporation shall pay to the Secretary of State
a filing fee. The filing fee shall be determined by the total expenditures made by the  municipal
corporation [ for any  and all purposes ] during the [ calendar or ] fiscal year audited[ , except that ex-
penditures for principal  of bonded debt, principal of short-term loans, principal of warrants redeemed
which were issued during prior audit periods, transfers  or loans between funds and turnovers of taxes
or other trust moneys to other municipal corporations shall not be  included in the total expenditures
upon which the amount of the fee is based ].
(2) The  filing fee to be paid shall be as indicated for those municipal corporations whose total
expenditures fall within the classifications as follows:
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
Over Not Over Fee
$ 50,000 $ 20
$ 50,000 150,000 40
150,000 500,000 150
500,000 1,000,000 200
1,000,000 5,000,000 250
5,000,000 10,000,000 300
10,000,000 50,000,000 350
50,000,000 400
[ ___________________________________________________________________________________ ]
Enrolled House Bill 2110 (HB 2110-A) Page 4
Over Not Over Fee
$ 50,000 $ 40
$ 50,000 150,000 80
150,000 250,000 150
250,000 500,000 250
500,000 1,000,000 300
1,000,000 5,000,000 350
5,000,000 10,000,000 400
10,000,000 50,000,000 450
50,000,000 500
(3) Audit reports filed by the administrative office of the county, under ORS  328.465 (2), for
school districts with less than 1,000 children according to the latest school census  in the county,
shall be considered one report for purposes of the filing  fee required by this section. The filing fee
shall be paid by the county administrative office and deducted pro rata from moneys due  to the se-
veral school districts.
SECTION 8.  ORS 297.525 is amended to read:
297.525. The  annual audit required to be made of the accounts and fiscal affairs of a county shall
include a cost audit , in accordance with rules of the Secretary of State,  of the cost account for
county road work.
SECTION 9. ORS 297.701 is repealed.
SECTION 10.  ORS 297.720 is amended to read:
297.720. Every auditor or accountant whose name is included on the roster of authorized ac-
countants referred to in ORS 297.670 shall pay to the Oregon Board of Accountancy  biennially a fee
for continuance thereon. The fee shall be in an amount [ not to exceed $100 as ] determined  by the
board by rule.
SECTION 11.  ORS 297.445 is amended to read:
297.445. (1) ORS 297.435 does not apply  to a municipal corporation for any [ calendar or ] fiscal
year if a petition requesting  an audit, signed by residents of the municipal corporation who are
subject to taxes, fees, assessments or  other charges levied by the municipal corporation, is filed with
the Secretary of State  within six months of the end of the fiscal year for which the audit is re-
quested. In a municipal corporation with a population of 150 or less, the  petition must be signed by
at least 10 residents. In a municipal corporation with a population of more than 150, the  petition
must be signed by at least 30 residents.
(2) The Secretary of State shall give notice  of the petition to the governing body of the munic-
ipal corporation within 10 days of its receipt. Upon receipt  of notice of the petition from the Sec-
retary of State, the governing body or managing or executive officer  of the municipal corporation
shall immediately comply with the provisions of ORS 297.425. If a copy of a  signed contract between
the governing body or managing or executive  officer and an accountant, or a duly authorized ordi-
nance or resolution requesting an  audit by the Secretary of State, is not received within 30 days
of the dispatch of notice of petition,  the Secretary of State shall cause an audit and review to be
made of the accounts and fiscal affairs of the municipal corporation designated in the petition.
(3) The costs incurred  by the Secretary of State in making the audit and review shall be borne
by the municipal corporation, and shall be paid to  the Secretary of State in the same manner as
other claims against the municipal corporation.
SECTION 12.  ORS 297.471 is amended to read:
297.471. (1) For each [ calendar or ] fiscal year under audit, the Secretary of  State shall prepare
and maintain a summary report that includes, at a minimum:
Enrolled House Bill 2110 (HB 2110-A) Page 5
(a) A list of the municipal corporations that  were required to file audit reports with the secre-
tary for the [ calendar or ] fiscal year as required by ORS 297.405 to 297.555;
(b) A list of the municipal corporations that filed audit reports with  the secretary within six
months after the close of the [ calendar or ] fiscal year under audit;
(c) A list of the municipal corporations that did not request a filing extension and did  not file
audit reports with the secretary  within six months after the close of the [ calendar or ] fiscal year
under audit;
(d) A list of the municipal corporations  that requested and were granted filing extensions and
either filed or did not file audit reports with the  secretary in accordance with the approved exten-
sion;
(e) A  list of the number and type of deficiencies cited in the audit report by the accountants for
each municipal corporation for the [ calendar or ] fiscal year under audit; and
(f) A description  of whether the municipal corporation submitted a plan of action for deficiencies
cited in the audit report  for the [ calendar or ] fiscal year under audit to the secretary as described
in ORS 297.466 (2) and (3).
(2) Not later than March 1 of each odd-numbered year, the Secretary of  State shall submit to
the appropriate legislative committee with authority over audits  copies of the two most recent
summary reports prepared under subsection (1) of this section. The secretary shall  make the sum-
mary reports available for public inspection in accordance  with the secretary’s established proce-
dures.
SECTION 13.  ORS 297.475 is amended to read:
297.475. Whenever any municipal corporation has made  a request to the Secretary of State,
pursuant to  ORS 297.425, for the audit of its accounts and fiscal affairs, the municipal corporation
may cancel that request by ordinance or resolution adopted and furnished  to the Secretary of State
at least 90 days prior to the end of a [ calendar or ] fiscal year.
Passed by House February 9, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2110 (HB 2110-A) Page 6